Nevada, session 83, SB29.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. To the extent that federal financial participation
is available, the Department shall develop and implement a system
of reimbursement for services provided to recipients of Medicaid
through an accountable care organization that focuses on
providing high-quality primary care. The system must include,
without limitation, incentive payments and other value-based
payment arrangements.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver or apply for any amendment of the State Plan for
Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive federal
funding to develop and implement the system required by this
section.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. An accountable care organization that wishes to
participate in the system developed and implemented pursuant to
subsection 1 must demonstrate to the Department that the
accountable care organization is providing services in a manner
that improves health outcomes and lowers costs compared to
persons who provide the same services through other models of
providing health care.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Accountable care organization” means a group of
providers of health care, medical facilities and other persons
providing health services who have entered into a partnership to
coordinate care and utilize innovative approaches to deliver care
to a specified population.
(b) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*SB29*

– 3 –
Sec. 3. 1. Each biennium, the Division shall survey
providers of health care who participate in Medicaid to solicit
recommendations for improving:
(a) The manner in which providers of health care request and
receive reimbursement from Medicaid; and
(b) The utilization of providers of health care who participate
in Medicaid.
2. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 4. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
-
*SB29*

– 4 –
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 5. 1. On or before January 1, 2026, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall submit to the United States
Secretary of Health and Human Services a request to amend the
State Plan for Medicaid to increase the rates of reimbursement
which are provided on a fee-for-service basis pursuant to the State
Plan for Medicaid for services provided by a physician or advanced
practice registered nurse:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), by at least 8
percent if the services are provided:
(1) In a county whose population is less than 100,000; or
(2) In any other county pursuant to a value-based payment
arrangement;
(b) By at least 11 percent if the services are provided:
(1) In a county whose population is less than 100,000; and
(2) Pursuant to a value-based payment arrangement; and
(c) By at least 5 percent, in all other cases.
-
*SB29*

– 5 –
2. The request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
supported using methods for determining rates of reimbursement
that are accepted by the Secretary.
3. The Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure
that a managed care organization that provides health services to
recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid pays at
least the rates of reimbursement established pursuant to subsection 1
for services described in that subsection.
4. As used in this section, “managed care organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695G.050.
Sec. 6. 1. This section and section 5 become effective upon
passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB29*